Florida, session 2026, SB1708.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 474.217, Florida 20 Statutes, is amended to read: 21 474.217âLicensure by endorsement.â 22 (1)âThe department shall issue a license by endorsement to 23 any applicant who, upon applying to the department and remitting 24 a fee set by the board, demonstrates to the board that she or 25 he: 26 (a)âHas demonstrated, in a manner designated by rule of the 27 board, knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of 28 veterinary medicine in this state; and 29 (b)1.âHolds, and has held for the 3 years immediately 30 preceding the application for licensure, a valid, active license 31 in good standing to practice veterinary medicine in another 32 state of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a 33 territory of the United States, provided that the applicant has 34 successfully completed a state, regional, national, or other 35 examination that is equivalent to or more stringent than the 36 examination required by the board; or 37 2.âMeets the qualifications of s. 474.207(2)(b) and has 38 successfully completed a state, regional, national, or other 39 examination which is equivalent to or more stringent than the 40 examination given by the department and has passed the boardâs 41 clinical competency examination or another clinical competency 42 examination specified by rule of the board. 43 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 44 made by this act to section 474.217, Florida Statutes, in a 45 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 474.2125, Florida 46 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 47 474.2125âTemporary license.â 48 (1)âThe board shall adopt rules providing for the issuance 49 of a temporary license to a licensed veterinarian of another 50 state for the purpose of enabling her or him to provide 51 veterinary medical services in this state for the animals of a 52 specific owner or, as may be needed in an emergency as defined 53 in s. 252.34(4), for the animals of multiple owners, provided 54 the applicant would qualify for licensure by endorsement under 55 s. 474.217. No temporary license shall be valid for more than 30 56 days after its issuance, and no license shall cover more than 57 the treatment of the animals of one owner except in an emergency 58 as defined in s. 252.34(4). After the expiration of 30 days, a 59 new license is required. 60 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.